District of Columbia statutes.
31-313

Canadian and British companies.

(a)

In the case of Canadian and British insurers, the annual audited financial report shall be defined as the annual statement of total business on the form filed by these companies with their domiciliary supervision authority duly audited by an independent chartered accountant.

(b)

For Canadian and British insurers, the letter required in § 31-304 shall state that the accountant is aware of the requirements relating to the annual audited statement filed with the Mayor pursuant to § 31-302 and shall affirm that the opinion expressed is in conformity with these requirements.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-48, § 14, 40 DCR 6102
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 31, 41 DCR 5193
1981 Ed., § 35-3213.